Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.300

Execution of sentence—Jail in lieu of fine and costs, computation.

In all cases of conviction, unless otherwise provided in chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW as now or hereafter amended, where a jail sentence is given to the defendant, execution shall issue accordingly and where the judgment of the court is that the defendant pay a fine and costs, the defendant may be committed to jail until the judgment is paid in full.

A defendant who has been committed shall be discharged upon the payment for such part of the fine and costs as remains unpaid after deducting from the whole amount any previous payment, and after deducting the amount allowed for each day of imprisonment, which amount shall be the same and computed in the same manner as provided for superior court cases in RCW 10.82.030 and 10.82.040, as now or hereafter amended. In addition, all other proceedings in respect of such fine and costs shall be the same as in like cases in the superior court.

[ 1984 c 258 s 115; 1969 c 84 s 1; 1961 c 299 s 79.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Application—1984 c 258 ss 101-139: See note following RCW 3.50.005.